Utah statutes.
54-8-24.   Payment to utilities -- Allowable costs.

(1)  In determining the conversion costs included in the costs and feasibility report required by Section 54-8-7, the public utility corporations shall be entitled to amounts sufficient to repay them for the following, as computed and reflected by the uniform system of accounts approved by the Public Service Commission, Federal Communications Commission, or Federal Power Commission:

(a)  the original costs less depreciation taken of the existing overhead electric and communication facilities to be removed;

(b)  the estimated costs of removing such overhead electric and communication facilities, less the salvage value of the facilities removed;

(c)  if the estimated cost of constructing underground facilities exceeds the original cost of existing overhead electric and communication facilities, then the cost difference between the two; and

(d)  the cost of obtaining new easements when technical considerations make it reasonably necessary to utilize easements for the underground facilities different from those used for aboveground facilities, or where the pre-existing easements are insufficient for the underground facilities.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), if conversion costs are included in tariffs, rules, or regulations filed with or promulgated by the Public Service Commission such conversion costs shall be the costs included in the costs and feasibility report.



Amended by Chapter 306, 2007 General Session

